Massachusetts, session 194th, H1378.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Subsection (3) of section 25 of chapter 118E of the General Laws, as appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the figure “XIX”, in line 40, the
following words:- or not exceeding $10,000 for an individual applicant or recipient or $15,000
for a married applicant or recipient.
of 1